Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 2

Municipal Budget Law of 1982

6-56-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Municipal Budget Law of 1982.”

Acts 1982, ch. 626, § 1.

6-56-202. Applicability.

This part applies to any municipality that does not have budget provisions in its charter that are at least as detailed as provided by § 6-56-203(1) and (3).

Acts 1982, ch. 626, § 1; 1993, ch. 448, § 4.

6-56-203. Annual budget ordinance.

The governing body of each municipality shall adopt and operate under an annual budget ordinance. The budget ordinance shall present a financial plan for the ensuing fiscal year, including at least the following information:

Estimates of proposed expenditures for each department, board, office or other agency of the municipality, showing in addition, the expenditures for corresponding items for the last preceding fiscal year, projected expenditures for the current fiscal year, and reasons for recommended departures from the current appropriation pattern in such detail as may be prescribed by the governing body. It is the intent of this subdivision (1) that, except for moneys expended pursuant to a project ordinance or accounted for in a proprietary type fund or a fiduciary type fund that are excluded from the budget ordinance, all moneys received and expended by a municipality shall be included in a budget ordinance. Therefore, notwithstanding any other law, no municipality may expend any moneys regardless of their source, including moneys derived from bond and long-term note proceeds, federal, state or private grants or loans, or special assessments, except in accordance with a budget ordinance adopted under this section or through a proprietary type fund or a fiduciary type fund properly excluded from the budget ordinance;

Statements of the bonded and other indebtedness of the municipality, including the debt redemption and interest requirements, the debt authorized and unissued, and the condition of the sinking fund;

Estimates of anticipated revenues of the municipality from all sources including current and delinquent taxes, nontax revenues, and proceeds from the sale of any bonds or long-term notes with a comparative statement of the amounts received by the municipality from each of such sources for the last preceding fiscal year, the current fiscal year, and the coming fiscal year in such detail as may be prescribed by the governing body;

A statement of the estimated balance or deficit, as of the end of the current fiscal year;

A statement of pending capital projects and proposed new capital projects, relating to respective amounts proposed to be raised therefor by appropriations in the budget and the respective amounts, if any, proposed to be raised therefor by the issuance of bonds during the fiscal year; and

Such other supporting schedules as the governing body deems necessary, or otherwise required by law.

Acts 1982, ch. 626, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Council or board approval of bills after payment made, OAG 99-075, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 75 (4/5/99).

6-56-204. Municipal school budget.

The municipal school budget submitted by the board of education to the governing body shall include estimates of school revenues, as well as estimates of expenditures necessary for the operation of the school system for the next fiscal period.

The governing body shall have no authority to modify or delete any item of the school estimates and shall have the power to modify only the total amount of the school budget, except that in no event shall a reduction in the school budget exceed the total sum requested by the board of education from current municipal revenues.

Such budget estimates shall not include any requests for the purchase of land, and the purchase, construction, reconstruction or major alteration of any building for school purposes. Requests for such improvements shall be transmitted to the governing body of the municipality or to the planning commission, in those municipalities where there is a planning commission, for review and incorporation into the capital improvement program.

Acts 1982, ch. 626, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Local governing body may not withhold funds that have been appropriated for school district's use, OAG 04-098, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 109 (6/24/04).

6-56-205. Excess appropriations prohibited — Emergencies.

The governing body shall not make any appropriations in excess of estimated available funds, except to provide for an actual emergency threatening the health, property or lives of the inhabitants of the municipality and declared by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of all members of the governing body present, when there is a quorum.

Acts 1982, ch. 626, § 1.

6-56-206. Notice and hearing on proposed budget.

A public hearing shall be held on the proposed budget ordinance before its final adoption by the governing body, at such time and place as the governing body shall direct.

The governing body of each municipality shall cause to be published the proposed annual operating budget and budgetary comparisons of the proposed budget with the prior year's actual figures and the current year's estimated figures, which information shall include the following:

Revenues and expenditures for the following governmental funds: general, streets/public works, general purpose school and debt service;

Revenues for each fund shall be listed separately by local taxes, state, federal government and other sources;

Expenditures for each fund shall be listed separately by salaries and other costs;

Beginning and ending fund balances shall be shown for each fund; and

The number of full-time equivalent employee positions shall be shown for each fund.

The publication shall be in a newspaper of general circulation and shall be published not less than ten (10) days prior to the meeting where the governing body will consider final passage of the budget.

The budget and all supporting data shall be a public record in the office of the chief financial officer of the municipality and shall be open to public inspection by anyone.

The chief financial officer shall cause sufficient copies of the budget ordinance and budget message, if there is one, to be prepared for distribution to interested persons at least ten (10) days before the hearing.

Acts 1982, ch. 626, § 1; 1991, ch. 484, § 11; 1993, ch. 448, § 5.

6-56-207. Limitation on tax levies and appropriations.

Except in cases of emergency as set out in § 6-56-205, no levy of property taxes shall be made by any municipality unless and until a budget ordinance has been adopted and no appropriation of moneys or revenues shall be made for any purpose contrary to the estimates in the budget ordinance.

Acts 1982, ch. 626, § 1.

6-56-208. Amendment of budget ordinance.

Except as otherwise restricted by law, the governing body may amend the budget ordinance in the same manner as any other ordinance may be amended.

Acts 1982, ch. 626, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Council or board approval of bills after payment made, OAG 99-075, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 75 (4/5/99).

6-56-209. Transfer of money.

The governing body by appropriate resolution or ordinance may authorize the budget officer to transfer moneys from one appropriation to another within the same fund, subject to such limitations and procedures as it may prescribe. Any such transfers shall be reported to the governing body at its next regular meeting and shall be entered in the minutes.

Acts 1982, ch. 626, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Council or board approval of bills after payment made, OAG 99-075, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 75 (4/5/99).

6-56-210. Carry over of appropriations.

If for any reason a budget ordinance is not adopted prior to the beginning of the next fiscal year, the appropriations for the last fiscal year shall become the appropriations for the next fiscal year, until the adoption of the new budget ordinance.

Acts 1982, ch. 626, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Council or board approval of bills after payment made, OAG 99-075, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 75 (4/5/99).

6-56-211. Unexpended appropriations.

Any portion of an annual appropriation remaining unexpended and unencumbered at the close of a fiscal year shall lapse and be credited to the general fund, except that any balance remaining in any other fund at the end of a fiscal year may remain to the credit of that fund and be subject to further appropriation.

Acts 1982, ch. 626, § 1.

6-56-212. Intragovernmental service funds.

If a local government or public authority establishes and operates one (1) or more intragovernmental service funds, it need not include such a fund in its budget ordinance. However, at the same time it adopts the budget ordinance, the governing body shall approve a balanced financial plan for each intragovernmental service fund. A financial plan is balanced when estimated expenditures do not exceed estimated funds available.

The budget officer shall include in the budget such officer submits to the governing body a proposed financial plan for each intragovernmental service fund to be operated during the budget year by the local government or public authority. The proposed financial plan shall be in such form and detail as prescribed by the budget officer or governing body.

The approved financial plan shall be entered in the minutes of the governing body, as shall each amendment to the plan approved by the governing body.

Any changes in a financial plan must be approved by the governing body.

Acts 1982, ch. 626, § 1.